Massachusetts, session 194th, H3256.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 17 of chapter 61A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting, after the first sentence, the following sentence:-
Notwithstanding the provisions in this section, if, by conveyance or other action of the
owner thereof, a portion of land previously used for agricultural purposes, which is valued,
assessed and taxed under the provisions of this chapter is separated for the purpose of producing
renewable energy, as defined in section 1 of chapter 164 of the General Laws, the land so
separated shall not be subject to liability for conveyance or roll-back taxes applicable thereto.
of 1